Maryland, session 2026, HB1042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 478 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that the structural racism training required under this Act be developed and
offered AT NO COST TO THE STATE using funding from EXTERNAL SOURCES, SUCH AS
the grant provided to the Maryland Nurses Association from the American Nurses
Association to advance antiracism efforts.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1042*